src/fst/test/gt-norm-yamls/A-lex_supmusj_gt-norm.gen.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-dict-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-dict-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-dict-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-dict-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

  Adjective - majemuš: # ok MLO
    majemuš+A+Der/Superl+A+Sg+Nom: majemuš
    majemuš+A+Der/Superl+A+Sg+Gen: majemuu
    majemuš+A+Der/Superl+A+Sg+Acc: majemuu
    majemuš+A+Der/Superl+A+Sg+Ill: majemužân
    majemuš+A+Der/Superl+A+Sg+Loc: majemuust
    majemuš+A+Der/Superl+A+Sg+Com: majemuin
    majemuš+A+Der/Superl+A+Sg+Abe: majemuuttáá
    majemuš+A+Der/Superl+A+Ess: majemužžân
    majemuš+A+Der/Superl+A+Par: majemužžâd
    majemuš+A+Der/Superl+A+Pl+Nom: majemuuh
    majemuš+A+Der/Superl+A+Pl+Gen: majemui
    majemuš+A+Der/Superl+A+Pl+Acc: majemuid
    majemuš+A+Der/Superl+A+Pl+Ill: majemuid
    majemuš+A+Der/Superl+A+Pl+Loc: majemuin
    majemuš+A+Der/Superl+A+Pl+Com: [majemuiguin, majemuigijn]
    majemuš+A+Der/Superl+A+Pl+Abe: majemuittáá
